pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Decoração de Natal > Bonecas japonesas tradicionais: Bonecos Daruma; Bonecos Gogatsu; Bonecos Hina; Bonecos Kokeshi
it: Casa e giardino > Arredo > Decorazioni natalizie > Bambole tradizionali giapponesi: Bambole Daruma; Bambole Gogatsu; Bambole Hina; Bambole Kokeshi
da: Hjem og have > Indretning > Højtidsdekorationer > Hina-dukker: Daruma-dukker; Gogatsu-dukker; Hina-dukker; Kokeshi-dukker
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Decorațiuni > Decorațiuni de sezon și de sărbători > Păpuși tradiționale japoneze: Păpuși daruma; Păpuși gogatsu; Păpuși hina; Păpuși kokeshi
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dekoracija > Sezonski in praznični okraski > Japonske tradicionalne lutke: Lutke Daruma; Lutke Gogatsu; Lutke Hina; Lutke Kokeshi
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Koristeet > Juhlakoristeet > Perinteiset japanilaiset nuket: Daruma-nuket; Gogatsu-nuket; Hina-nuket; Kokeshi-nuket
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Dekoracije > Sezonski i blagdanski ukrasi > Tadicionalne japanske lutke: Lutke Daruma; Lutke Gogatsu; Lutke Hina; Lutke Kokeshi
fr: Maison et jardin > Décorations > Décorations de Noël et saisonnières > Poupées traditionnelles japonaises: Poupées Daruma; Poupées Gogatsu; Poupées Hina; Poupées Kokeshi
ru: Дом и сад > Декор > Праздничный декор > Японские традиционные куклы: Куклы Дарума; Куклы Гогацу; Куклы Хина; Куклы Кокеши
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Dekorácie > Sezónne a sviatočné dekorácie > Japonské tradičné bábiky: Japonské sošky Daruma; Japonské sošky Gogatsu; Japonské sošky Hina; Japonské sošky Kokeshi
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 装饰 > 节假日装饰品 > 日本传统人偶: 达摩人偶; 五月人偶; 雏人偶; 木偶人偶
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 실내 장식 > 명절/크리스마스 장식 > 일본 전통 인형: 다루마 인형; 고가츠 인형; 히나 인형; 코케시 인형
de: Heim & Garten > Dekoration > Festtags-Dekoartikel > Traditionelle Japanische Puppen: Daruma-Puppen; Gogatsu-Puppen; Hina-Puppen; Kokeshi-Puppen
nl: Huis en tuin > Decoratie > Seizoens- en feestdagdecoraties > Hina-poppen: Daruma-poppen; Gogatsu-poppen; Hina-poppen; Kokeshi-poppen
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Decorações sazonais e de férias > Bonecas tradicionais japonesas: Bonecas Daruma; Bonecas Gogatsu; Bonecas Hina; Bonecas Kokeshi
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Διακόσμηση > Εποχιακές & γιορτινές διακοσμήσεις > Παραδοσιακές ιαπωνικές κούκλες: Κούκλες Daruma; Κούκλες Gogatsu; Κούκλες Hina; Κούκλες Kokeshi
nb: Hjem og hage > Dekor > Sesongbaserte og høytidsdekorasjoner > Tradisjonelle japanske dukker: Daruma-dukker; Gogatsu-dukker; Hina-dukker; Kokeshi-dukker
en: Home & Garden > Decor > Seasonal & Holiday Decorations > Japanese Traditional Dolls: Daruma Dolls; Gogatsu Dolls; Hina Dolls; Kokeshi Dolls
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Dekoras > Sezoniniai ir šventiniai papuošimai > Tradicinės japoniškos lėlės: Darumos lėlės; Gogatsu lėlės; Hina lėlės; Kokeshi lėlės
pl: Dom i ogród > Ozdoby > Ozdoby sezonowe i świąteczne > Tradycyjne lalki japońskie: Lalki Daruma; Lalki Gogatsu; Lalki Hina; Lalki Kokeshi
sv: Hem och trädgård > Dekor > Säsongsbaserade dekorationer och helgdekorationer > Hinadockor: Daruma-dockor; Gogatsu-dockor; Hina-dockor; Kokeshi-dockor
vi: Nhà và vườn > Trang trí > Đồ trang trí theo mùa và ngày lễ > Búp bê truyền thống Nhật Bản: Búp Bê Daruma; Búp Bê Gogatsu; Búp Bê Hina; Búp Bê Kokeshi
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > インテリア・エクステリア > 季節の飾り > 雛人形・五月人形: だるま; 五月人形; 雛人形; こけし
hu: Otthon és kert > Dekoráció > Szezonális és ünnepi dekorációk > Hagyományos japán babák: Daruma babák; Gogatsu babák; Hina babák; Kokeshi babák
cs: Dům a zahrada > Bytové doplňky a dekorace > Slavnostní a sezónní dekorace > Japonské tradiční panenky: Panenky Daruma; Panenky Gogatsu; Panenky Hina; Panenky Kokeshi
th: บ้านและสวน > ของประดับตกแต่ง > การตกแต่งตามเทศกาลและวันหยุด > ตุ๊กตาญี่ปุ่นดั้งเดิม: ตุ๊กตาดารุมะ; ตุ๊กตาโกกัตสึ; ตุ๊กตาฮินะ; ตุ๊กตาโคเคชิ
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Декорация > Сезонни и празнични декорации > Японски традиционни кукли: Кукли Дарума; Кукли Гогацу; Кукли Хина; Кукли Кокеши
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Dekor > Mevsim ve Bayram Dekorasyonları > Geleneksel Japon Oyuncak Bebekleri: Daruma Bebekleri; Gogatsu Bebekleri; Hina Bebekleri; Kokeshi Bebekleri
es: Casa y jardín > Decoración > Decoraciones festivas y estacionales > Muñecas tradicionales japonesas: Muñecas Daruma; Muñecas Gogatsu; Muñecas Hina; Muñecas Kokeshi
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 裝飾用品 > 季節性飾品 > 日本人形娃娃: 達摩玩偶; 五月娃娃; 女兒節娃娃; 木芥子娃娃